en: Tea leaves
de: Teeblätter
es: Hojas de té
fr: Feuilles de thé
hr: Listići čaja
hu: Tealevél
it: Foglie di tè
nl: Theeblaadjes

en: Teas
bg: Чай
ca: Tè
cs: Čaje
da: Te
de: Tees, Tee
es: Tés
fi: teet
fr: Thés
he: סוגי תה
hr: čajevi, čaj
hu: Teák
it: Tè
ja: 茶
la: Camellia sinensis
lt: Arbatos
nl: Theeën, Thee
pl: Herbata, Herbaty
pt: Chás
ru: Чай
sv: Teer, te
th: ชา
tr: Çay
zh: 茶

en: Tea bags, Teas in bags, teas in tea-bags
de: Teebeutel, Tee in Beuteln, Tee in Teebeuteln
es: Bolsitas de té, Tés en bolsas, Tés en bolsas de té
fi: teepussit
fr: Thés en sachets
hr: Vrećice čaja
hu: Teafilterek, Teafilter, Filteres teák
it: Bustine di tè
ja: ティーバッグ
lt: Arbatos maišeliai, Arbata maišeliuose, arbata arbatos maišeliuose
nl: Theezakjes
pt: Saquinhos de chá, chás em sacos, chás em saquinhos de chá
ru: Чайные пакетики
tr: Poşet çay, Sallama çay
zh: 袋茶, 茶包, 袋泡茶

en: Black teas, black tea
bg: Черен чай
da: sort te
de: Schwarze Tees, Schwarztees
es: Tés negros
fi: mustat teet
fr: Thés noirs, Thé noir
hr: Crni čajevi
hu: Fekete teák, Fekete tea
it: Tè nero
ja: 黒茶
lt: Juodoji arbata
nl: Zwarte theeën, Zwarte thee
pl: Czarna herbata, Herbata czarna
ro: Ceauri negre, Ceai negru
ru: Чай чёрный, Чёрный чай, Чай черный, Черный чай
sv: svarta teer, svart te
tr: Siyah çay
zh: 黑茶

en: Brewed black tea without sugar
fr: Thé noir infusé non sucré

en: Flavored black teas
de: Aromatisierte schwarze Tees, Aromatisierte Schwarztees
fi: maustetut mustat teet
fr: Thés noirs aromatisés
hr: Aromatizirani crni čajevi
hu: Ízesített fekete teák, Ízesített fekete tea
it: Tè nero aromatizzato
lt: Aromatizuotos juodosios arbatos
nl: Gearomatiseerde zwarte theeën, Gearomatiseerde zwarte thee

en: Lemon flavored black teas
de: Schwarze Tees mit Zitronenaroma, Schwarztees mit Zitronenaroma
fr: Thés noirs aromatisés au citron
hr: Crni čajevi s okusom limuna
hu: Citromos fekete teák, Citromos fekete tea
lt: Citrinų aromato juodosios arbatos
nl: Zwarte theeën met citroenaroma, Zwarte thee met citroenaroma, Zwarte thee met citroensmaak

en: Teas with bergamot, Bergamot teas
de: Tees mit Bergamotte, Earl-Grey Tees
fr: Thés à la bergamote
hr: Čajevi s bergamotom
hu: Bergamottos teák, Bergamott teák, Bergamottnarancsos teák, Earl Grey teák
lt: Arbatos su bergamote, bergamočių arbatos
nl: Bergamottheeën, Bergamotthee
ru: Чаи с бергамотом

en: Bergamot flavored black teas
fr: Thés noirs aromatisés à la bergamote
hr: Crni čajevi s okusom bergamota
nl: Zwarte theeën gearomatiseerd met bergamot, Zwarte thee gearomatiseerd met bergamot

en: Chaï teas
de: Chai, Chai Tee
fr: Thés chaï, thé au lait et aux épices
hr: Chaï čajevi
ja: チャイ
nl: Chai, Chai thee
zh: 印度奶茶

en: Decaffeinated teas
de: Entkoffeinierte Tees
es: Tés descafeinados
fi: kofeiinittomat teet
fr: Thés décaféinés
hr: Čajevi bez kofeina
hu: Koffeinmentes teák
it: Tè decaffeinato
nl: Caffeïnevrije theeën, Caffeïnevrije thee
pl: Herbaty bezkofeinowe
pt: Chás descafeinados
ru: Безкофеиновые чаи
zh: 无咖啡因茶

en: Fermented teas
da: Fermenterede teer
de: Fermentierte Tees
es: Tés fermentados
fr: Thés sombres, Thé sombre
hr: Fermentirani čajevi
hu: Fermentált teák
lt: Fermentuotos arbatos, Raugintos arbatos
nl: Gefermenteerde theeën, Gefermenteerde thee
sv: Fermenterade teer

en: Flavored teas, Flavoured teas
de: Aromatisierte Tees
es: Tés aromatizados
fi: maustetut teet
fr: Thés aromatisés, Thé aromatisé, thés parfumés
hr: Aromatizirani čajevi
hu: Ízesített teák, Ízesített tea
it: Tè aromatizzati
lt: Aromatizuotos arbatos
nl: Gearomatiseerde theeën, Gearomatiseerde thee
pl: Herbaty aromatyzowane
pt: Chás com sabor

en: Ceylan teas
fr: Thés de ceylan
hr: Ceylan čajevi
hu: Ceyloni teák
lt: Ceilono arbatos
nl: Ceylontheeën, Ceylon thee, Ceylonthee, Theeën uit Ceylon, Theeën uit Sri Lanka

en: Green teas
bg: Зелен чай
ca: Te verd
da: Grøn te
de: Grüne Tees, Grüner Tee, Grüntee
es: Tés verdes
fi: vihreät teet
fr: Thés verts, Thé vert, Thés vert
he: תה ירוק
hr: Zeleni čajevi
hu: Zöld teák, Zöld tea
it: Tè verde
ja: 緑茶
lt: Žalioji arbata, žaliosios arbatos
nl: Groene theeën, Groene thee
pl: Zielona herbata, Herbata zielona
pt: Chás verdes
ro: Ceauri verzi, Ceai verde
ru: Зелёный чай
sv: Grönt te
tr: Yeşil çay
zh: 绿茶

fr: Thés verts aromatisés
es: Tés verdes aromatizados
it: Tè verde aromatizzato
nl: Gearomatiseerde groene theeën

en: Brewed green tea without sugar
fr: Thé vert infusé non sucré

en: Roasted Japanese green teas
de: Geröstete japanische grüne Tees, Geröstete japanische Grüntees
fr: Thés verts torréfiés japonais
hr: Prženi japanski zeleni čajevi
nl: Geroosterde Japanse groene theeën, Geroosterde Japanse groene thee

en: Hōjicha teas, Hojicha teas
de: Hōjicha
fr: Thés Hojicha, Hojicha, Bancha Hojicha
hr: Hōjicha čajevi
nl: Hojicha

en: Matcha powders
xx: Matcha